Missouri, session 2026, HB2440.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 494.425, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 494.425, to read as follows:
494.425. The following persons shall be disqualified from serving as a petit or grand
juror:
(1) Any person who is less than [twenty-one] nineteen years of age;
(2) Any person not a citizen of the United States;
(3) Any person not a resident of the county or city not within a county served by the
court issuing the summons;
(4) Any person who has been convicted of a felony, unless such person has been
restored to his civil rights;
(5) Any person unable to read, speak and understand the English language, unless
such person's inability is due to a vision or hearing impairment which can be adequately
compensated for through the use of auxiliary aids or services;
(6) Any person on active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States or any
member of the organized militia on active duty under order of the governor;
(7) Any judge of a court of record;
(8) Any person who, in the judgment of the court, is incapable of performing the
duties of a juror because of mental or physical illness or infirmity. The juror or the juror's
personal representative, may provide the court with documentation from a physician licensed
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2440 2
to practice medicine verifying that a mental or physical condition renders the person unfit for
jury service for a period of up to twenty-four months.
✔